troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_de_DE@traditional.dic
yn1t
yno2d
y1p2o1
y2r1r2
yr2i3e
y2s5iat
y1si
ys8ty1
yä8m
z1g
z1wal
z1wel
z1wer
z4t3e2n1d
z4t3hei
z5a6b
z5auf
z5q
z6we8r1g
z8thi
za5is
za1b5l8
ze1ro
ze4di1k
ze1d
ze1di
ze6la
ze8lec
ze1le
ze8ste
zei4ta
zei8te2r1s
zei1te
zel8th
ze2l1t
zen8zin
zen1zi
z2e1r8i
zerta8
zer8tab
ze2r1t
zer8tag
ze2r1s8
zeu6gr4
zi1en
zi1na
zi1tr6
zi5es.
zi5th
zin6s5er
zin1se
zist5r6
zo1on
zo6gl
z8o1g
zor6na8
zo2rn
zu1b4
zu1f2
zu1o
zu1s8
zu1z
zu3al
zu1n2a
zun1f8
zup8fi
zwei3s
zwi1s
zz8a
zzi1s
z1zi
zö1le
ß1b8
ß1c
ß1d
ß1f8
ß1g
ß1h
ß1k
ß1l
ß1m
ß1n
ß1o
ß1p8
ß1r
ß1s2
ß1ta
ß1te
ß1ti
ß1tr6
ß1v
ß1w
ß1z
ß5ec
ß5q
ß5to
ß8as
ßmana8
ß1ma
ß3man
ßst8
ßt3hei
ä1a6
ä1che
äc8h
ä1e
ä1he
ä1hi
ä1hu
ä1isc
ä1k
ä1le
ä1no
ä1pa
ä1re
ä1ri
ä1ro
ä1ru
ä1te
ä1ti
ä1to
ä1um.
ä1us.
ä1z
ä3chi
ä5chu
ä5fa
ä5i2s1m
ä5j
ä5na
ä5rö
ä5tu
ä6d5ia
ä1di
ä6g5nan
ägn8
ä1gna
ä6i1sche
äisc8h
ä6s5chen
ä1sche
äsc8h
ä6thy
ä8lei
äb1l8
äch8sc
ä2chs
äch8sp2
äc1k5a
äc2k
äd1a
äd5era
ä1de
äf1l
äf2t6s
ä2ft
äg1h
äg3le
äg5str6
ä2gs
äh1le
äh1re
ä6hr
äh1ru
äh1w
äh5ne
äh5ri
ä8l1c
äl6schl6
ä2ls
äl1sc
älsc8h
äm8n8
ä2m8s
ämi1e
ä1mi
än6s5c
ä6ns
äne5i8
ä1ne
äng3l
änk5l8
äp6s5c
är1c
är6gl
äre8m
är2t6s5
ä2r1t
ä2s1th
äse6n8s
ä1se
ät8schl6
ä2ts
ätsc8h
äta8b
ät2e1ri4
äter5it
äts1p2
äu1e
ä6u5i
äu8ga
äub1l8
ö1b
ö1che
öc8h
ö1he
ö1hu
ö1is
ö1ke
ö1mu
ö1no
ö1re
ö1ri
ö1ru
ö1te
ö1ti
ö1tu
ö1v
ö1w
ö2z
ö5chi
ö5na
ö5o6t
ö5th
öch8stei
ö2chs
öch1ste
öch8str6
ö2cht6
öh1l8
öh1re
ö6hr
öl6k5l8
ö6l1k
öl8pl8
ö6l1p
öni2g6s3
ö1ni
öp6s5c
öpf3l
ör8g1li
ö8r1g
ör8tr6
ö2r1t
öwe8
ü1che
üc8h
ü1chi
ü1he
ü1hu
ü1le
ü1lu
ü1re
ü1ri
ü1ro
ü1ru
ü1te
ü1ti
ü1tu
ü1v
ü2d1o4
ü3k
ü3ta
ü5pi
ü6deu
ü1de
ü6h5e6rk
ü6s5te1te
ü1ste
ü8ch3l6
ü8c2k
ü8heh
ü8rei
ü8sta
ü8stes
üb1l8
ü1b1r
üch6s5c
ü2chs
üc1k1a
ück5e2r1s
üd1a2
ü2d5s6
üdi8t
ü1di
üg1l
üge4l5a
ü1ge
üh1le
üh1re
ü6hr
üh1ru
üh1w
üh5a
ül4l5a
ü6ll
ül4ps
ü6l1p
ül6s5c
ü2ls
ül8lo
ün6zw8
ün8da
ü2n1d
ün8fei
ün1f
ün1fe
ün8za
ünk5l8
ür8fl
ür1f
ür8fr6
ür8geng
ü8r1g
ür1ge
ür8sta
ü2r1s
ür8ster
ür1ste
üse8n
ü1se
üt8tr6
ü2t1t
üt8zei
ü2tz
üt1ze
